Washington statutes.
RCW 7.75.090

Application of chapter.

Nothing in this chapter precludes any person or persons not operating under RCW 7.75.020 from providing dispute resolution services. However, the provisions of RCW 7.75.050, relating to confidentiality, and RCW 7.75.080, relating to statutes of limitation, apply only to proceedings conducted by a dispute resolution center established under this chapter.

[ 1984 c 258 s 509.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.